Tennessee, session 114, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2004(9)(A), is amended by
deleting "and wind sources" and substituting "wind sources, and nuclear energy production
facilities".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1133
002366
- 1 -